Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.230

Appeal from certain decisions to deny student's request to attend nonresident district—Procedure.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5253-S.SL) ***

(1) The decision of a school district within which a student under the age of twenty-one years resides or of a school district within which such a student under the age of twenty-one years was last enrolled and is considered to be a resident for attendance purposes by operation of law, to deny such student's request for release to a nonresident school district pursuant to RCW 28A.225.220 may be appealed to the superintendent of public instruction or his or her designee: PROVIDED, That the school district of proposed transfer is willing to accept the student.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction or his or her designee shall hear the appeal and examine the evidence. The superintendent of public instruction may order the resident district to release such a student who is under the age of twenty-one years if the requirements of RCW 28A.225.220 have been met. The decision of the superintendent of public instruction may be appealed to superior court pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, as now or hereafter amended.

(3) The decision of a school district to deny the request for accepting the transfer of a nonresident student under RCW 28A.225.225 may be appealed to the superintendent of public instruction or his or her designee. The superintendent or his or her designee shall hear the appeal and examine the evidence. The superintendent of public instruction may order the district to accept the nonresident student if the district did not comply with the standards and procedures adopted under RCW 28A.225.225. The decision of the superintendent of public instruction may be appealed to the superior court under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 204; 1990 c 33 s 236; 1977 c 50 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 66 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.242.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 66: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 66 s 4.]

Designation of high school district nonhigh district students shall attend—Effect when attendance otherwise: RCW 28A.540.110.